lingvodoc/static/parsers/hfst/xal/rules.xfst
define ConsNG [ б | в | г | һ | д | җ | з | й | к | л | м | н | п | р | с | т | ф | х | ц | ч | ш | щ ];
define ConsDat [ в | һ | җ | з | й | к | л | м | н | п | т | ф | х | ц | ч | щ ];
define ConsSHS [ б | в | г | һ | д | җ | з | й | к | л | м | н | п | р | т | ф | х | ц | ч | щ ];
define Cons [ ConsNG | ң ];
define AlvCons [ л | н | д | т ];
define LabCons [ м | в | б ];
define PlovCons [ б | д | г ];
define TrillCons [ р ];
define AlvPlCons [ д | т ];
define FricCons [ с | ш ];
define NazCons [ м | н | ң ];
define LatCons [ л ];
define SoftLetter [ ь ];
define VCon [ в ];
define NGCon [ ң ];
define PluralCons [ к | г ];
define Letters [ Vowels | Cons ];
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR1 а -> [ а а ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR2 а -> [ а а ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR3 а -> [ а а ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR4 а -> [ а а ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR5 е -> [ е е ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR6 е -> [ е е ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR7 е -> [ е е ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR8 е -> [ е е ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR9 ә -> [ ә ә ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR10 ә -> [ ә ә ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR11 ә -> [ ә ә ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR12 ә -> [ ә ә ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR13 и -> [ и и ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR14 и -> [ и и ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR15 и -> [ и и ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR16 и -> [ и и ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR17 о -> [ о о ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR18 о -> [ о о ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR19 о -> [ о о ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR20 о -> [ о о ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR21 ө -> [ ө ө ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR22 ө -> [ ө ө ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR23 ө -> [ ө ө ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR24 ө -> [ ө ө ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR25 у -> [ у у ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR26 у -> [ у у ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR27 у -> [ у у ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR28 у -> [ у у ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR29 ү -> [ ү ү ] || ".#." "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR30 ү -> [ ү ү ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR31 ү -> [ ү ү ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR32 ү -> [ ү ү ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "+" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR33 а -> [ а а ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR34 а -> [ а а ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR35 а -> [ а а ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR36 а -> [ а а ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR37 е -> [ е е ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR38 е -> [ е е ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR39 е -> [ е е ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR40 е -> [ е е ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR41 ә -> [ ә ә ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR42 ә -> [ ә ә ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR43 ә -> [ ә ә ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR44 ә -> [ ә ә ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR45 и -> [ и и ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR46 и -> [ и и ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR47 и -> [ и и ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR48 и -> [ и и ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR49 о -> [ о о ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR50 о -> [ о о ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR51 о -> [ о о ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR52 о -> [ о о ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR53 ө -> [ ө ө ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR54 ө -> [ ө ө ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR55 ө -> [ ө ө ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR56 ө -> [ ө ө ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR57 у -> [ у у ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR58 у -> [ у у ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR59 у -> [ у у ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR60 у -> [ у у ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR61 ү -> [ ү ү ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR62 ү -> [ ү ү ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR63 ү -> [ ү ү ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ;
define NounXxXNoun01XxXR64 ү -> [ ү ү ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ;
define VerbMoodXxXAppr52XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" в з _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXApprOrphV154XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" у з _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXHort57XxXR1 ы -> 0 || Vowels "+" _ й ;
define VerbMoodXxXHort57XxXR2 ы -> и || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ й\ й о [?+] "+" ;
define VerbMoodXxXHortTDialV158XxXR1 [ й а ] -> [ й ә ] || SoftVowels[?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXJuss163XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" т х _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXOpt74XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" с _ ;
define VerbMoodXxXOpt76XxXR1 у -> ү || SoftVowels [?*] "+" с _ ;
define VerbAssocXxXAssoc82XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" ц х _ ;
define VerbAspectXxXDur95XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbAspectXxXDur2106XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" җ _ ;
define VerbAspectXxXDur2107XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" ч _ ;
define ReflPart2XxXReflPart26497XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ г ;
define ReflPart1XxXReflPart26498XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] Vowels "+" һ _ н ;
define ReflPart1XxXReflPart26498XxXR2 һ -> 0 ||  Cons "+" _ [ а | ә ]  н ;
define QPart3XxXQPart26502XxXR1 у -> ү || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define PTCPLXxXPtcplHab26523XxXR1 [ д г ] -> д || _ "+" м н ;
define PTCPLXxXPtcplPst26534XxXR1 н -> м || _ "+" б ;
define PTCPLXxXPtcplPst26534XxXR2 [ с н ] -> [ с ] || _ "+" м н ;
define PronQuaXxXPronQua026551XxXR1 н -> м || _ "+" б ;
define QPart4XxXQPart26557XxXR1 б -> [ м б ] || х "+" _ ;
define QPart4XxXQPartOrphV126558XxXR1 б -> [ м б ] || х "+" _ и ;
define VerbTenseXxXPres26568XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" н _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXProg26572XxXR1 [ җ а н а ] -> [ җ ә н ә ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXProg26572XxXR2 [ н а ] -> [ н ә ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" җ ә _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXProg26576XxXR1 [ ч а н а ] -> [ ч ә н ә ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXPstOrphV126587XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" в _ ;
define VerbTenseXxXPstOrphV226592XxXR1 у -> ү || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ в ;
define VerbTenseXxXRem26596XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?*] "+" л _ ;
define NegPartXxXNegPart26619XxXR1 г -> 0 || г "+" "^" _ о ;
define NegPartXxXNegPart26619XxXR2 г -> 0 || г "^" "+" "^" _ о ;
define ConvXxXConvAnt26633XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?+] "+" _ д ;
define ConvXxXConvAnt26633XxXR2 [ а д ] -> [ һ а д ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvAnt26633XxXR3 [ ә д ] -> [ һ ә д ] || Vowels "+" _ ;
define ConvXxXConvCond26639XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?+] "+" в _ с ;
define ConvXxXConvIpfv26654XxXR1 ч -> [ ч | җ ] || AlvPlCons "+" _ "}" ;
define ConvXxXConvIpfv26654XxXR2 ч -> җ || LatCons "+" _ "}" ;
define ConvXxXConvIpfv26654XxXR3 ч -> җ || Vowels "+" _ "}" ;
define ConvXxXConvProg26663XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?+] "+" с _ р ;
define ConvXxXConvPurp26664XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?+] "+" х _ р ;
define ConvXxXConvSucc26665XxXR1 а -> ә || SoftVowels [?+] "+" х л _ р н ;
define CollNumXxXCollNum26693XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" л у л н ;
define CollNumXxXCollNum26693XxXR2 [ л у л н ] -> [ л ү л н ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _  ;
define CollNumXxXCollNum26695XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" у л н ;
define CollNumXxXCollNum26695XxXR2 [ у л н ] -> [ ү л н ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _  ;
define CollNumXxXCollNum26697XxXR1 н -> 0 || _ "+" у р н ;
define CollNumXxXCollNum26697XxXR2 [ у р н ] -> [ ү р н ] || SoftVowels [?*] "+" _  ;
define CollNumXxXCollNum26697XxXR3 [ у р н ] -> [ ю р н ] || й "+" _ ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR1 ң -> [ ң г ] || _ "+" Vowels ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR2 н -> 0 || _ "€" "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR3 н -> 0 || _ "{" ".#.";
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR4 н -> 0 || _ "€" "{" "+" ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR5 [ а а ] -> [ а ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR6 [ а а ] -> [ а ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR7 [ а а ] -> [ а ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR8 [ а а ] -> [ а ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR9 [ ә ә ] -> [ ә ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR10 [ ә ә ] -> [ ә ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR11 [ ә ә ] -> [ ә ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR12 [ ә ә ] -> [ ә ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR13 [ е е ] -> [ е ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR14 [ е е ] -> [ е ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR15 [ е е ] -> [ е ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR16 [ е е ] -> [ е ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR17 [ и и ] -> [ и ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR18 [ и и ] -> [ и ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR19 [ и и ] -> [ и ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR20 [ и и ] -> [ и ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR21 [ о о ] -> [ о ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR22 [ о о ] -> [ о ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR23 [ о о ] -> [ о ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR24 [ о о ] -> [ о ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR25 [ ө ө ] -> [ ө ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR26 [ ө ө ] -> [ ө ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR27 [ ө ө ] -> [ ө ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR28 [ ө ө ] -> [ ө ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR29 [ у у ] -> [ у ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR30 [ у у ] -> [ у ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR31 [ у у ] -> [ у ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR32 [ у у ] -> [ у ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR33 [ ү ү ] -> [ ү ] || ".#." "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR34 [ ү ү ] -> [ ү ] || ".#." "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR35 [ ү ү ] -> [ ү ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ "{" ".#." ;
define CaseAcc2XxXAcc2026705XxXR36 [ ү ү ] -> [ ү ] || ".#." Cons "^" _ Cons "{" ".#." ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR1 [ г а с ] -> [ я с ] || н ь "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR2 ь -> 0 || _ "+" я с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR3 [ г а с ] -> [ г ә с ] || SoftVowels[?*] "+" _ ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR4 г -> 0 || ConsNG "+" _ а с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR5 г -> 0 || ConsNG "+" _ ә с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR6 г -> 0 || ConsNG "@" "+" _ а с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR7 г -> 0 || ConsNG "@" "+" _ ә с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR8 г -> 0 || ConsNG "ꙧ" "+" _ а с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR9 г -> 0 || ConsNG "ꙧ" "+" _ ә с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR10 г -> 0 || ConsNG "ꙧ" "ɛ" "+" _ а с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR11 г -> 0 || ConsNG "ꙧ" "ɛ" "+" _ ә с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR12 г -> 0 || ConsNG "ɛ" "+" _ а с ;
define CaseXxXAbl26715XxXR13 г -> 0 || ConsNG "ɛ" "+" _ ә с ;
